Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.270

Amendment to quorum or voting requirements.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation that adds, changes, or deletes a quorum or voting requirement must meet the same quorum requirement and be approved by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be approved, whichever is greater.

[ 2024 c 22 s 16; 2009 c 189 s 20; 1990 c 178 s 11; 1989 c 165 s 75.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1990 c 178: See note following RCW 23B.01.220.